New Jersey, session 222, A4219.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    It shall be an unlawful discrimination for a shelter that operates under the Shelters for Victims of Domestic Violence Act, P.L.1979, c.337 (C.30:14-1 et seq.) to deny admission to a person seeking the shelters services based on that persons disability or perceived disability.  Whenever the Attorney General receives a complaint alleging an unlawful discrimination pursuant to this section, a complaint shall be investigated and prosecuted in accordance with the provisions of the Law Against Discrimination, P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.